Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6138.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "data center water regulation act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Closed-loop cooling system" means a sealed cooling process in which the same water or coolant circulates continuously within a data center's cooling system without withdrawal of water from a municipal water system, groundwater, or surface water and without discharge of wastewater to a municipal water system, groundwater, or surface waters. (b) "Commission" means the Michigan public service commission created in section 1 of 1939 PA 3, MCL 460.1. (c) "Data center" means a facility in this state that is composed of 1 or more buildings and that is designed and intended for housing, and does house, data center equipment to centralize the storage and processing of data. (d) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. Sec. 5. (1) A person shall not begin construction or operation of a data center unless 1 or more of the following requirements are met: (a) The data center will use a closed-loop cooling system. (b) The data center will use only water that is sourced from a municipal water system. (2) A person shall not operate a data center that began construction or operation on or after the effective date of this act unless 1 or more of the following requirements are met: (a) The data center uses a closed-loop cooling system. (b) The data center uses only water that is sourced from a municipal water system. (3) If a person is operating a data center in violation of subsection (2), including, but not limited to, by using groundwater or surface water for the data center, the person shall immediately cease operation of the data center. Sec. 7. A person that violates this act is subject to a civil fine of not more than $1,000,000.00 for each day of violation. The prosecutor of the county in which the violation occurred or the attorney general may bring an action to collect the civil fine or to obtain an injunction against the person. A civil fine collected under this section must be deposited in the general fund. Sec. 9. The commission may promulgate rules to implement this act under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06933'26) or House Bill No. 6135 (request no. H06933'26). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06934'26) or House Bill No. 6139 (request no. H06934'26). (c) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06939'26) or House Bill No. 6137 (request no. H06939'26). (d) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06942'26) or House Bill No. 6140 (request no. H06942'26). (e) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06943'26) or House Bill No. 6142 (request no. H06943'26). (f) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S07181'26) or House Bill No. 6141 (request no. H07181'26).